Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 9. Unemployment Compensation Fund.

§ 71-5-451.
Establishment and control [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

There is established as a special fund, separate and apart from all public monies or funds of this state, an Unemployment Compensation Fund, which shall be administered by the department exclusively for:

All contributions collected under this chapter;

Interest earned upon any monies in the fund;

Any property or securities acquired through the use of monies belonging to the fund;

All earnings of such property or securities;

All monies credited to this state’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund pursuant to the Social Security Act, 42 USCS, Section 1104; and

By way of reimbursement in accordance with Section 204 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970 (84 Stat. 711). All monies in the fund shall be mingled and undivided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7394; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 536, § 1(a); Laws, 1964, ch. 448, § 1(a); Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 10; Laws, 1982, ch. 383, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 36, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-453.
Accounts and deposits.

The department shall be the treasurer and custodian of the fund, and shall administer such fund in accordance with the directions of the department, and shall issue its warrants upon it in accordance with such regulations as the department shall prescribe. The department shall maintain within the fund three (3) separate accounts: (a) a clearing account, (b) an unemployment trust fund account, and (c) a benefit payment account. All monies payable to the fund, upon receipt thereof by the department, shall be immediately deposited in the clearing account. Refunds payable pursuant to Section 71-5-383 may be paid from the clearing account by the department. Transfers pursuant to Section 71-5-114 of all interest, penalties and damages collected shall be made to the Special Employment Security Administration Fund as soon as practicable after the end of each calendar quarter. Workforce Enhancement Training contributions, State Workforce Investment contributions and Mississippi Works contributions shall be deposited into the Workforce Investment and Training Holding Account as described in this section. All other monies in the clearing account shall be immediately deposited with the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of America to the Unemployment Trust Fund account for the State of Mississippi, established and maintained pursuant to Section 904 of the Social Security Act, as amended, any provisions of law in this state relating to the deposit, administration, release or disbursement of monies in the possession or custody of this state to the contrary notwithstanding. The benefit account shall consist of all monies requisitioned from this state’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund. Except as herein otherwise provided, monies in the clearing and benefit accounts may be deposited by the department, in any bank or public depository in which general funds of the state may be deposited, but no public deposit insurance charge or premium shall be paid out of the fund. The department shall be liable for the faithful performance of its duties in connection with the Unemployment Compensation Fund under this chapter. A Workforce Investment and Training Holding Account shall be established by and maintained under the control of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security. Contributions collected pursuant to the provisions in this chapter for the Workforce Enhancement Training Fund, State Workforce Investment Fund and the Mississippi Works Fund shall be transferred from the clearing account into the Workforce Investment and Training Holding Account on the same schedule and under the same conditions as funds transferred to the Unemployment Compensation Fund. Such funds shall remain on deposit in the holding account for a period of thirty (30) days. After such period, Workforce Enhancement Training contributions shall be transferred to the appropriate Mississippi Community College Board Treasury Account by the department. The State Workforce Investment contributions shall be transferred to the State Workforce Investment Board bank account established by the department, and the department shall have the authority to deposit and disburse funds from the State Workforce Investment Board bank account as directed by the State Workforce Investment Board. The Mississippi Works contributions shall be transferred to the Mississippi Department of Employment Security Treasury Account for the Mississippi Works Fund. Such transfers shall occur within fifteen (15) days after the funds have resided in the Workforce Investment and Training Holding Account for thirty (30) days. One (1) such transfer shall be made monthly, but the department, in its discretion, may make additional transfers in any month. In the event such funds transferred are subsequently determined to be erroneously paid or collected, or if deposit of such funds is denied or rejected by the banking institution for any reason, or deposits are unable to clear drawer’s account for any reason, the funds must be reimbursed by the recipient of such funds within thirty (30) days of mailing of notice by the department demanding such refund, unless funds are available in the Workforce Investment and Training Holding Account. In that event such amounts shall be immediately withdrawn from the Workforce Investment and Training Holding Account by the department and re-deposited into the clearing account.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7395; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 536, § 1(b); Laws, 1964, ch. 448, § 1(b); Laws, 1982, ch. 383, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 437, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 10; Laws, 2014, ch. 504, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 302, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 21, 2016).

§ 71-5-455.
Withdrawals.

Monies shall be requisitioned from this state’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund solely for the payment of benefits and in accordance with regulations prescribed by the department, except that monies credited to this state’s account pursuant to Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, shall be used exclusively as provided in Section 71-5-457. No monies in the Unemployment Compensation Fund shall be used to pay interest on any funds that might be borrowed for the purposes of this chapter, but any such interest that might be due shall be paid from other sources. The department shall from time to time requisition from the Unemployment Trust Fund such amounts, not exceeding the amount standing to this state’s account therein, as it deems necessary for the payment of benefits for a reasonable future period. Such sums shall be immediately deposited by the department in some bank within this state in an account to be known as the “benefit payment account,” which shall be under the control of the department and on which said benefit payment account the department or its duly authorized representative is authorized to draw and issue its checks in payment of benefits to individuals entitled thereto under this chapter. Expenditures of such monies in the benefit account and benefit payment account and refunds from the clearing account shall not be subject to any provisions of law requiring specific appropriations or other formal release by state officers of money in their custody. All warrants shall bear the signature of the department’s duly authorized agent for that purpose.

The department shall be subject to the applicable laws pertaining to security of public fund deposits as set forth in Sections 27-105-5 and 27-105-6.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7396; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 536, § 1(c); Laws, 1964, ch. 448, § 1(c); Laws, 1984, ch. 301, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 303, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013).

§ 71-5-457.
Unemployment trust fund used for payment of administrative expenses [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), money credited to the account of this state in the Unemployment Trust Fund by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of America pursuant to the Social Security Act, 42 USCS Section 1103, may be requisitioned and used for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this law pursuant to a specific appropriation by the Legislature, provided that the expenses are incurred and the money is requisitioned after the enactment of an appropriation law which:

Specifies the purposes for which such money is appropriated and the amounts appropriated therefor;

Limits the period within which such money may be obligated to a period ending not more than two (2) years after the date of the enactment of the appropriation law; and

Limits the amount which may be obligated during a twelve-month period beginning on July 1 and ending on the next June 30 to an amount which does not exceed the amount by which:

The aggregate of the amounts credited to the account of this state pursuant to the Social Security Act, 42 USCS Section 1103, during the same twelve-month period and the thirty-four (34) preceding twelve-month periods exceeds.

The aggregate of the amounts obligated pursuant to this section and charged against the amounts credited to the account of this state during such thirty-five (35) twelve-month periods.

For the purposes of this section, amounts obligated during any such twelve-month period shall be charged against equivalent amounts which were first credited and which are not already so charged; except that no amount obligated for administration during any such twelve-month period may be charged against any amount credited during such a twelve-month period earlier than the thirty-fourth preceding such period.

Money credited to the account of this state pursuant to the Social Security Act, 42 USCS Section 1103, may not be withdrawn or used except for the payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses for the administration of this law and of public employment offices pursuant to this section.

Money appropriated as provided herein for the payment of expenses of administration shall be requisitioned as needed for the payment of obligations incurred under such appropriation and, upon requisition, shall be deposited in the Employment Security Administration Fund, from which such payments shall be made. Money so deposited shall, until expended, remain a part of the Unemployment Compensation Fund and, if it will not be expended, shall be returned promptly to the account of this state in the Unemployment Trust Fund.

The thirty-five-year limitation provided in this section is no longer in force, effective October 1, 1991.

Notwithstanding subsection (1), monies credited with respect to federal fiscal years 1999, 2000 and 2001 shall be used by the department solely for the administration of the unemployment compensation program.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7396.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 536, § 1(d); Laws, 1964, ch. 448, § 1(d); Laws, 1971, ch. 519, § 11; Laws, 1975, ch. 393; Laws, 1981, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 357; Laws, 1984, ch. 301, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 449 § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 37, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 71-5-459.
Management of funds upon discontinuance of unemployment trust fund.

The provisions of Sections 71-5-451 through 71-5-459, to the extent that they relate to the unemployment trust fund, shall be operative only so long as such unemployment trust fund continues to exist and so long as the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of America continues to maintain for this state a separate book account of all funds deposited therein by this state for benefit purposes and of money credited pursuant to Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, together with this state’s proportionate share of the earnings of such unemployment trust fund, from which no other state is permitted to make withdrawals. If and when such unemployment trust fund ceases to exist or such separate book account is no longer maintained, all moneys, properties, or securities therein belonging to the unemployment compensation fund of this state shall be transferred to the treasurer of the unemployment compensation fund, who shall hold, invest, transfer, sell, deposit, and release such moneys, properties, or securities in a manner approved by the commission, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, provided that such moneys shall be invested in the following readily marketable classes of securities: bonds or other interest bearing obligations of the United States of America, the State of Mississippi, and of any county; consolidated school district, supervisors district road bonds, and municipal bonds of counties, cities, and towns of Mississippi; federal land bank bonds and home owners loan corporation bonds; Yazoo and Mississippi Delta Levee District bonds; Mississippi Levee District bonds; municipal bonds of cities with a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) and over located in the states of Louisiana, Texas, Arkansas, Alabama, Georgia, Florida, and Tennessee; and provided further that such investment shall at all times be so made that all the assets of the fund shall always be readily convertible into cash when needed for the payment of benefits. The treasurer shall dispose of securities or other properties belonging to the unemployment compensation fund only under direction of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7397; Laws, 1940, ch. 295; Laws, 1958, ch. 536, § 1(e); Laws, 1964, ch. 448, § 1(e), eff from and after passage (approved June 6, 1964).